Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2709
Probate, adoption, trust jurisdiction; continuances.

In all proceedings within the probate, guardianship, conservatorship, adoption, or trust jurisdiction of the county court when a date for a hearing has been fixed and when no action is taken by the court at the time so fixed, the cause shall stand continued from day to day as a matter of law and may thereafter be heard and determined by the court without further notice at any time, except that any party who has filed an appearance or pleading in such proceedings shall be given such notice of the hearing in such manner as the court shall direct.

Laws 1951, c. 55, § 1, p. 188;

R.S.1943, § 24-528.01;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 53;

Laws 1977, LB 167, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-553.